Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1285
Certificate; surrender and cancellation; when required.

Each owner of a motorboat and each person mentioned as owner in the last certificate of title, when the motorboat is dismantled, destroyed, or changed in such a manner that it loses its character as a motorboat or changed in such a manner that it is not the motorboat described in the certificate of title, shall surrender his or her certificate of title to any county treasurer or to the Department of Motor Vehicles. If the certificate of title is surrendered to a county treasurer, he or she shall, with the consent of any holders of any liens noted on the certificate, enter a cancellation upon the records and shall notify the department of the cancellation. Beginning on the implementation date designated by the Director of Motor Vehicles pursuant to subsection (3) of section 60-1508, a wrecker or salvage dealer shall report electronically to the department using the electronic reporting system. If the certificate is surrendered to the department, it shall, with the consent of any holder of any lien noted on the certificate, enter a cancellation upon its records. Upon cancellation of a certificate of title in the manner prescribed by this section, the county treasurer and the department may cancel and destroy all certificates and all memorandum certificates in that chain of title.

Laws 1994, LB 123, § 13;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 21;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 21;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 4.